Utah statutes.
13-34-112.   Limitation of authority.

Except for satisfying the criteria and standards for registration provided for in this chapter or by division rule, nothing in this chapter gives the division authority to regulate the content of individual courses or regulate the day-to-day operations of a proprietary educational institution.

